Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.015

Proposed incorporations—Notice to county—Boundary review board hearing.

Any person proposing the incorporation of a city or town shall file a notice of the proposed incorporation with the county legislative authority of the county in which all or the major portion of the proposed city or town is located. The notice shall include the matters required to be included in the incorporation petition under RCW 35.02.030 and be accompanied by both a one hundred dollar filing fee and an affidavit from the person stating that he or she is a registered voter residing in the proposed city or town.

The county legislative authority shall promptly notify the boundary review board of the proposed incorporation, which shall hold a public meeting on the proposed incorporation within thirty days of the notice being filed where persons favoring and opposing the proposed incorporation may state their views. If a boundary review board does not exist in the county, the county legislative authority shall provide the public meeting. The public meeting shall be held at a location in or near the proposed city or town. Notice of the public meeting shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the area proposed to be incorporated at least once ten days prior to the public meeting.

[ 1994 c 216 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 216: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 1, 1994]." [ 1994 c 216 s 21.]